Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 45. new text end new text begin Department of Human Services home and community-based services provider support and technical assistance team. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish and maintain a home and community-based services provider support and technical assistance team to deliver proactive and coordinated support to home and community-based services providers. The commissioner must ensure that the home and community-based services provider support and technical assistance team has sufficient staff and resources to perform the functions required under this subdivision. The home and community-based services provider support and technical assistance team must: new text end new text begin (1) serve as a provider liaison and help desk for providers' technical, regulatory, and operational questions; new text end new text begin (2) develop training and onboarding materials for home and community-based services providers; new text end new text begin (3) collect data on home and community-based provider challenges; new text end new text begin (4) coordinate the functions of the department, including information technology, licensing, provider enrollment, service delivery oversight, and program integrity oversight to clarify program requirements, provider requirements, and service requirements and to support providers with compliance and prevention of fraud; and new text end new text begin (5) make recommendations to the commissioner regarding changes to the operations of the department or to the design and implementation of home and community-based services that would improve the delivery of services and improve program integrity. new text end